Utah statutes.
4-22-8.5.   Additional assessment for government liaison and industry relations programs -- Exemption from the assessment.

(1)  In addition to the assessment provided in Section 4-22-7, an assessment of three-fourths of one cent is imposed upon each 100 pounds of milk or cream produced and sold, or contracted for sale, through commercial channels in this state for the purposes specified in Subsection (3).

(2)  The three-fourths of one cent assessment shall be paid in the same manner as the assessment required by Section 4-22-7.

(3)  The commission shall use the revenue derived from the three-fourths of one cent assessment imposed by this section to contract out for services and expenses of government liaison and industry relations programs created to stabilize and protect the state's dairy industry and the health and welfare of the public.

(4)  A producer who objects to payment of the assessment imposed by this section may, by January 31, submit a written request to the commission to be exempted from payment of the assessment for that year.  By January 1 each year, the commission shall send a postage-paid, self-addressed postcard to each person subject to the assessment which may be returned to request an exemption.

